North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-19 Distance Education

15-19-00.1.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Administration” includes the leadership of the center for distance education.

“Board” means the state board for career and technical education.

“Center” means the North Dakota center for distance education.

“Director” means the director and executive officer of the department of career and technical education.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 141, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

15-19-01.
North Dakota center for distance education courses — Establishment — Enrollment of students — Courses of instruction.

The state shall provide kindergarten through grade twelve courses, comprehensive educational support, and high school diplomas through the center for distance education under the following provisions:

A complete curriculum prescribed by state-mandated education accreditation entities which meets the requirements for digital education the superintendent of public instruction has determined to be appropriate.

A superintendent or an administrator of a school may deny the enrollment of a student in that district at the center for distance education except as provided in subsection 5.

The center for distance education may provide services to persons who are not North Dakota residents.

Center for distance education students shall pay fees as may be prescribed by the state board for career and technical education.

Students exempt from the compulsory school attendance laws pursuant to subdivision e of subsection 1 of section 15.1-20-02 may enroll in distance education courses offered through the center for distance education. These students may study their center for distance education lessons in their learning environment under the supervision of a parent.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 257, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 15-1901; S.L. 1955, ch. 132, § 25; 1957 Supp., § 15-1901; S.L. 1965, ch. 127, § 1; 1971, ch. 170, § 1; 1989, ch. 198, § 1; 1991, ch. 164, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 171, § 1; 1999, ch. 162, § 1; 2001, ch. 161, § 4; 2003, ch. 137, § 1; 2007, ch. 156, § 1; 2019, ch. 141, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

15-19-01.1.
Distance education courses — Course lists to school districts — Notification.

The center for distance education shall provide by December thirty-first of each year, a complete list of courses offered by the center to all school districts. Each school district shall notify its students and their parents or guardians of the complete list of courses offered and the school district’s policies for course selection and related fees.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 46, § 5, effective July 1, 2017.

15-19-02.
Administration Center for distance education — Appointment and duties.

The program of and all activities related to the center for distance education are the responsibility of the center for distance education and under the authority of the state board for career and technical education. The director of the department of career and technical education shall hire administration and staff for the center for distance education who must be classified under the state personnel merit system. The administration of the center shall carry out the responsibilities in operating the center for distance education in the manner approved by the state board for career and technical education, under the supervision of the director of the department of career and technical education, and compliant with requirements established by the superintendent of public instruction and the education standards and practices board for public school administrators and teachers. The state board for career and technical education shall administer the responsibilities of the board of a school district relating to the center for distance education.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 257, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 15-1902; S.L. 1955, ch. 132, § 26; 1957 Supp., § 15-1902; S.L. 1965, ch. 127, § 2; 1971, ch. 170, § 2; 1989, ch. 199, § 1; 2001, ch. 501, § 1; 2003, ch. 137, § 2; 2007, ch. 156, § 2; 2019, ch. 141, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

15-19-02.1.
Distance education clearinghouse.

The administration of the center for distance education shall establish a clearinghouse for online courses delivered to North Dakota schools for the purpose of providing:

A list of the online courses and providers for all North Dakota schools to access.

Awareness of online courses available in new and emerging careers.

A list of comparative prices for online courses and other online services.

Awareness of the differences between technological innovation and learning innovation.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 46, § 6, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 141, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

15-19-03.
Duties of superintendents of schools — Authorization of enrollments. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 257, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 15-1903; S.L. 1955, ch. 132, § 27; 1957 Supp., § 15-1903; S.L. 1965, ch. 127, § 3; 1971, ch. 170, § 3; 2007, ch. 156, § 3; repealed by 2019, ch. 141, § 8, effective August 1, 2019.

15-19-04.
Duty of superintendent — Advertising. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 257, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 15-1904; S.L. 1965, ch. 127, § 4; 1987, ch. 39, § 3; 1991, ch. 164, § 3; 1999, ch. 162, § 2; 2001, ch. 161, § 5; 2003, ch. 137, § 3; 2007, ch. 156, § 4; repealed by 2019, ch. 141, § 8, effective August 1, 2019.

15-19-05.
Study centers — Adult classes. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 127, § 6.

15-19-06.
Special funds — Deposit of collections — Transfers from general fund appropriations.

A special operating fund for the center for distance education must be maintained within the state treasury and all income and fees collected by the center for distance education from any source must be remitted monthly by the director to the state treasurer and credited to the special operating fund. All expenditures from the fund must be within the limits of legislative appropriations and must be made upon vouchers, signed and approved by the director. Upon approval of the vouchers by the office of the budget, warrant-checks must be prepared by the office of management and budget.

The state board for career and technical education may establish an endowment and scholarship fund to provide financial grants to students enrolled in courses offered through the center for distance education. The endowment and scholarship fund may consist only of those funds specifically appropriated by the legislative assembly and property received by the center for distance education as a gift, devise, or bequest. Any gift, devise, or bequest of property received by the center for distance education which is designated by the state board for career and technical education and donor for the endowment and scholarship fund must be deposited in the scholarship fund at the Bank of North Dakota. The center for distance education may draw on the endowment and scholarship fund for the award of endowments and scholarships within the limits and rules adopted by the state board for career and technical education.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 257, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 15-1906; S.L. 1955, ch. 132, § 28; 1957 Supp., § 15-1906; S.L. 1961, ch. 156, § 1; 1963, ch. 200, § 1; 1965, ch. 127, § 5; 1971, ch. 170, § 4; 1979, ch. 187, § 2; 1985, ch. 206, § 1; 1989, ch. 199, §§ 2, 4; 2001, ch. 501, § 2; 2003, ch. 137, § 4; 2005, ch. 261, § 3; 2007, ch. 156, § 5; 2019, ch. 141, § 5, effective August 1, 2019.

15-19-07.
Fees collected deposited in general fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 127, § 6.

15-19-08.
Distance education support and services.

The amount of money appropriated by the legislative assembly for distance education support and services for a biennium, or so much thereof as may be necessary, must be expended first for work provided by distance education as determined by the center for distance education and approved by the state board for career and technical education.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 158, § 1; 1989, ch. 199, § 3; 1991, ch. 164, § 4; 2007, ch. 156, § 6; 2019, ch. 141, § 6, effective August 1, 2019.